Missouri, session 2026, HB2370.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 376.1240, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 376.1240, to read as follows:
376.1240. 1. For purposes of this section, terms shall have the same meanings as
ascribed to them in section 376.1350, and the term "self-administered hormonal
contraceptive" shall mean a drug that is composed of one or more hormones and that is
approved by the Food and Drug Administration to prevent pregnancy, excluding emergency
contraception. Nothing in this section shall be construed to apply to medications approved by
the Food and Drug Administration to terminate an existing pregnancy.
2. (1) Any health benefit plan delivered, issued for delivery, continued, or renewed in
this state on or after January 1, 2026, that provides coverage for self-administered hormonal
contraceptives shall provide coverage to reimburse a health care provider or dispensing entity
for the dispensing of a supply of self-administered hormonal contraceptives intended to last
up to ninety days, or intended to last up to one hundred eighty days for generic self-
administered hormonal contraceptives. The provisions of this subdivision shall no longer
be in effect after December 31, 2026.
(2) Any health benefit plan delivered, issued for delivery, continued, or renewed
in this state on or after January 1, 2027, that provides coverage for self-administered
hormonal contraceptives shall provide coverage to reimburse a health care provider or
dispensing entity for the dispensing of a supply of self-administered hormonal
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2370 2
contraceptives, including generic and brand-name contraceptives, intended to last up to
one year.
3. The coverage required under this section shall not be subject to any greater
deductible or co-payment than other similar health care services provided by the health
benefit plan.
✔